Idaho, session 2025, H0357.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 8, Title 57, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 57-829, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
57-829. AMERICA250 COMMEMORATION FUND -- AMERICA250 ADVISORY COMMIT-
TEE. (1) There is hereby created in the state treasury the America250 commem-
oration fund for the purpose of funding Idaho's participation in celebrating
the two hundred fiftieth anniversary of America's founding. All moneys in
the fund are to be used only for the purposes provided in this section, and
shall be expended only as directed and approved by the America250 advisory
committee pursuant to the provisions of subsection (4) of this section.
(2) Moneys in the fund shall include:
(a) Any remaining amounts appropriated by the legislature during the
2024 legislative session for the purposes described by this section;
and
(b) Gifts, grants, and other donations.
(3) The state treasurer shall invest the idle moneys of the America250
commemoration fund, and the interest earned on such investments shall be
retained by such fund. All unobligated funds remaining in the America250
commemoration fund on June 30, 2027, shall be transferred by the state con-
troller on such date into the general fund.
(4)(a) There is hereby created the America250 advisory committee that
shall be comprised of seven (7) members, and shall include the director
of the state historical society, the state treasurer, one (1) member
appointed by the governor, and four (4) members appointed by the leg-
islative council. The legislative council shall select the chair of
the America250 advisory committee. The America250 advisory committee
shall direct and approve all distributions of funds from the America250
commemoration fund. The America250 advisory committee shall meet at
least annually at such place and time as it determines and may meet as
often as necessary to discharge the duties imposed on it.
(b) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the divi-
sion of financial management shall approve the spending authority of
the America250 commemoration fund for any spending directive that is
approved by the America250 advisory committee for any state entity in
the same manner as the approval process for funds that are not cogniz-
able pursuant to section 67-3516(2), Idaho Code. Spending authority


approved pursuant to this subsection shall only be made for each state
entity that does not have sufficient authority within such entity's
current appropriation from its miscellaneous revenue fund or other
allowable fund to comply with the America250 advisory committee's
spending directive. If a state entity does not have an allowable mis-
cellaneous fund from which to expend moneys, the state entity shall
establish a miscellaneous revenue fund to facilitate the spending di-
rective of the America250 advisory committee.
(c) The state treasurer, on behalf of the America250 advisory com-
mittee, shall record and track all revenues and expenditures by fund
sources pursuant to subsection (2) of this section for each approved
purpose and to ensure that moneys are not allocated in excess of avail-
able revenue.
SECTION 2. The provisions of Section 1 of this act shall be null, void
and of no force and effect on and after July 1, 2027.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.